Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1700.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-106, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-106. Identity verified fingerprints An applicant who applies for a new teaching certificate in order to teach in a school district, a participant in field experience or student teaching in this state, an applicant who applies for a renewal of an existing teaching certificate in order to continue teaching in a school district, an applicant who is required for the first time to be fingerprinted in order to teach in a charter school and an applicant who is required to renew fingerprints in order to continue teaching in a charter school pursuant to section 15-183, an applicant who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to section 15-512 or 15-2407 and any person who is contracted by this state, by a school district or by a charter school to provide tutoring services shall submit for an identity verified fingerprint card that will be used by the department of public safety to process the fingerprint clearance card pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1 as follows: 1. The applicant shall submit a request for an application packet from the department of public safety. 2. The application packet shall be contained in an envelope specified by the department of public safety and shall include the following: (a) A blank applicant fingerprint card. (b) An application for a fingerprint clearance card. (c) Instructions for the return of returning the application packet. 3. A school district or charter school may contract for fingerprinting services through an entity or entities and shall provide a copy of the instructions to the entity or entities as provided by the department of public safety regarding the submission of identity verified fingerprints. If a school district or charter school elects to provide fingerprinting services, the school district or charter school shall authorize an individual employed by the school district or charter school to administer the services. 4. The department of public safety shall provide instructions to law enforcement agencies and public schools regarding the submission of identity verified fingerprints. The department of public safety shall reject the application for a fingerprint clearance card if the application is not correct or is not submitted according to the instructions provided by the department of public safety. 5. The applicant, at the time that identity verified fingerprints are taken, shall provide the law enforcement agency, school district, charter school or other entity with a completed application form for a fingerprint clearance card, the fingerprint card with the requisite demographic information and the required fee in the form of a money order or cashier's check made out to the department of public safety. The law enforcement agency, school district, charter school or other entity shall verify the identity of the applicant through recognized means of photographic identification and a comparison of the demographic information on the photographic identification against the demographic information on the application form and the fingerprint card. The authorized person taking the fingerprints shall enter on the application form a description of the photographic identification presented by the applicant.  The law enforcement agency, school district, charter school or other entity shall place the completed fingerprint card, the completed application form or any other form required by the department of public safety and the fee provided by the applicant in the postage prepaid envelope provided by the department of public safety and mail it to the fingerprinting division in the department of public safety. A law enforcement agency, school district, charter school or other entity may charge the applicant a reasonable fee for services provided pursuant to this section. 6. Fingerprints submitted electronically or through an internet-based system pursuant to section 41-1758.01 shall include a completed application for a fingerprint clearance card, the requisite applicant demographic information and the required fee, and shall be identity verified in accordance with instructions provided by the department of public safety.  The department shall reject the application for a fingerprint clearance card if the application is not correct or is not submitted according to the department's instructions. The entity or entities contracted by the department shall comply with: (a) All information privacy and security measures and submission standards established by the department. (b) The information technology security policy approved by the department. 7. The department of public safety shall process the application packet in the same manner prescribed for fingerprint clearance cards issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1. 8. The department of public safety shall provide for digital storage and retrieval of identity verified fingerprints taken pursuant to this section. The fingerprints taken pursuant to this section shall be digitally designated in the fingerprint archive as identity verified fingerprint records. 9. A person who has a set of identity verified fingerprints on file with the department of public safety pursuant to this section shall is not be required to submit a new set of fingerprints to the department of public safety to renew the person's fingerprint clearance card. On receipt of the required application form and fee for a renewal fingerprint clearance card from a person required to submit identity verified fingerprints, the department of public safety shall attempt to use the electronic copy of the applicant's identity verified fingerprints that are retained pursuant to this section to conduct the state and national criminal records checks. The department of public safety may require the applicant to submit a new set of identity verified fingerprints if the department of public safety determines that the original fingerprints submitted have been lost or damaged or are found to be otherwise of insufficient quality to conduct a valid technical fingerprint search either by the department of public safety or the federal bureau of investigation. 10. A person who participates in a teacher preparation program that is approved by the state board of education and who does not participate in field experience or student teaching in this state shall is not be required to obtain a fingerprint clearance card pursuant to this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-2402. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts; funds A. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts are established to provide options for the education of students in this state. B. To enroll a qualified student for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account, the parent of the qualified student must sign an agreement to do all of the following: 1. Use a portion of the Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies allocated annually to provide an education for the qualified student in at least the subjects of reading, grammar, mathematics, social studies and science, unless the Arizona empowerment scholarship account is allocated monies according to a transfer schedule other than quarterly transfers pursuant to section 15-2403, subsection G. 2. Not enroll the qualified student in a school district or charter school and release the school district from all obligations to educate the qualified student.  This paragraph does not: (a) Relieve the school district or charter school that the qualified student previously attended from the obligation to conduct an evaluation pursuant to section 15-766. (b) Require the qualified student to withdraw from a  any school district or charter school before enrolling for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account if the qualified student withdraws from the school district or charter school before receiving any monies in the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account. (c) Prevent the qualified student from applying in advance for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account to be funded beginning the following school year, subject to section 15-2403, subsection H. 3. Not accept a scholarship from a school tuition organization pursuant to title 43 concurrently with an Arizona empowerment scholarship account for the qualified student in the same year a parent signs the agreement pursuant to this section. 4. Use monies deposited in the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account only for the following expenses of the qualified student: (a) Tuition or fees at a qualified school that requires all teaching staff and school personnel who have unsupervised contact with students to be fingerprinted satisfy the fingerprint clearance card and employment eligibility requirements prescribed by section 15-2407, subsection A. (b) Textbooks required by a qualified school. (c) If the qualified student meets any of the criteria specified in section 15-2401, paragraph 7, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii) or (iii) as determined by a school district or by an independent third party pursuant to section 15-2403, subsection J, the qualified student may use the following additional services: (i) Educational therapies from a licensed or accredited practitioner or provider, including and up to any amount not covered by insurance if the expense is partially paid by a health insurance policy for the qualified student. (ii) A licensed or accredited paraprofessional or educational aide. (iii) Tuition for vocational and life skills education approved by the department. (iv) Associated goods and services that include educational and psychological evaluations, assistive technology rentals and braille translation goods and services approved by the department. (d) Tutoring or teaching services provided by an individual who is approved by the department and not subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education for immoral or unprofessional conduct pursuant to section 15-505 or 15-534.04 or a facility that is approved by the department and accredited by a state, regional or national accrediting organization. The department shall ensure that any individual who provides tutoring or teaching services to one or more qualified students pursuant to this subdivision is not subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education.  The department shall also remove any individual who is subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education from all platforms that the department provides to parents and qualified students for the purchase of goods or educational services using account monies.  The department may not approve an expense under this subdivision if the tutor or teacher who provides the services either: (i) Had the individual's certificate suspended or revoked by the state board of education, including reciprocal suspension or revocation. (ii) Is subject to disciplinary action by the state board of education for immoral or unprofessional conduct. (e) Curricula and supplementary materials. (f) Tuition or fees for a nonpublic online learning program. (g) Fees for a nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement test, an advanced placement examination or any exams related to college or university admission. (h) Tuition or fees at an eligible postsecondary institution. (i) Textbooks required by an eligible postsecondary institution. (j) Fees to manage the Arizona empowerment scholarship account. (k) Services provided by a public school, including individual classes and extracurricular programs. (l) Insurance or surety bond payments. (m) Uniforms purchased from or through a qualified school. (n) If the qualified student meets the criteria specified in section 15-2401, paragraph 7, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii) or (iii) and if the qualified student is in the second year prior to the final year of a contract executed pursuant to this article, costs associated with an annual education plan conducted by an independent evaluation team. The department shall prescribe minimum qualifications for independent evaluation teams pursuant to this subdivision and factors that teams must use to determine whether the qualified student shall be eligible to continue to receive monies pursuant to this article through the school year in which the qualified student reaches twenty-two years of age. An independent evaluation team that provides an annual education plan pursuant to this subdivision shall submit a written report that summarizes the results of the evaluation to the parent of the qualified student and to the department on or before July 31. The written report submitted by the independent evaluation team is valid for one year. If the department determines that the qualified student meets the eligibility criteria prescribed in the annual education plan, the qualified student is eligible to continue to receive monies pursuant to this article until the qualified student reaches twenty-two years of age, subject to annual review. A parent may appeal the department's decision pursuant to title 41, chapter 6, article 10. As an addendum to a qualified student's final-year contract, the department shall provide the following written information to the parent of the qualified student: (i) That the qualified student will not be eligible to continue to receive monies pursuant to this article unless the results of an annual education plan conducted pursuant to this subdivision demonstrate that the qualified student meets the eligibility criteria prescribed in the annual education plan. (ii) That the parent is entitled to obtain an annual education plan pursuant to this subdivision to determine whether the qualified student meets the eligibility criteria prescribed in the annual education plan. (iii) A list of independent evaluation teams that meet the minimum qualifications prescribed by the department pursuant to this subdivision. (o) Public transportation services in this state, including a commuter pass for the qualified student, or transportation network services as defined in section 28-9551 between the qualified student's residence and a qualified school in which the qualified student is enrolled. (p) Computer hardware and technological devices primarily used for an educational purpose. For the purposes of this subdivision, "computer hardware and technological devices": (i) Includes calculators, personal computers, laptops, tablet devices, microscopes, telescopes and printers. (ii) Does not include entertainment and other primarily noneducational devices, including televisions, telephones, video game consoles and accessories, and home theatre and audio equipment. 5. Not file an affidavit of intent to homeschool pursuant to section 15-802, subsection B, paragraph 2 or 3. 6. Not use monies deposited in the qualified student's account for any of the following: (a) Computer hardware or other technological devices, except as otherwise allowed under paragraph 4, subdivision (c) or (p) of this subsection. (b) Transportation of the pupil, except for transportation services described in paragraph 4, subdivision (o) of this subsection. C. In exchange for the parent's agreement pursuant to subsection B of this section, the department shall transfer from the monies that would otherwise be allocated to a recipient's prior school district, or if the child is currently eligible to attend a preschool program for children with disabilities, a kindergarten program or any of grades one through twelve, the monies that the department determines would otherwise be allocated to a recipient's expected school district of attendance, to the treasurer for deposit into an Arizona empowerment scholarship account an amount that is equivalent to ninety percent of the sum of the base support level and additional assistance prescribed in sections 15-185 and 15-943 for that particular student if that student were attending a charter school. D. The department of education empowerment scholarship account fund is established consisting of monies appropriated by the legislature. The department shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation. Monies in the fund shall be used for the department's costs in administering Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts under this chapter. Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. If the number of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts significantly increases after fiscal year 2020-2021, the department may request an increase in the amount appropriated to the fund in any subsequent fiscal year in the budget estimate submitted pursuant to section 35-113. The department shall list monies in the fund as a separate line item in its budget estimate. E. The state treasurer empowerment scholarship account fund is established consisting of monies appropriated by the legislature. The state treasurer shall administer the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used for the state treasurer's costs in administering the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts under this chapter. If the number of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts significantly increases after fiscal year 2020-2021, the state treasurer may request an increase in the amount appropriated to the fund in any subsequent fiscal year in the budget estimate submitted pursuant to section 35-113. Monies in the fund are subject to legislative appropriation.  Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. The state treasurer shall list monies in the fund as a separate line item in its budget estimate. F. A parent must renew the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account on an annual basis. The department of education shall verify that the parent's child is a qualified student as defined in section 15-2401 or 15-2401.01 in the year for which the parent seeks to renew the Arizona empowerment scholarship account.  This subsection does not require the department to annually verify the child's disability for the purpose of section 15-2401, paragraph 7, subdivision (a), item (i), (ii) or (iii), if applicable. G. Notwithstanding any changes to the student's multidisciplinary evaluation team plan, a student who has previously qualified for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account remains eligible to apply for renewal until the student finishes high school. H. If a parent does not renew the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account for a period of three academic years, the department shall notify the parent that the qualified student's account will be closed in sixty calendar days. The notification must be sent through certified mail, email and telephone, if applicable.  The parent has sixty calendar days to renew the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account. If the parent chooses not to renew or does not respond in sixty calendar days, the department shall close the account and any remaining monies shall be returned to the state. I. A signed agreement under this section constitutes school attendance required by section 15-802. J. A qualified school or a provider of services purchased pursuant to subsection B, paragraph 4 of this section may not share, refund or rebate any Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies with the parent or qualified student in any manner. K. Notwithstanding subsection H of this section, on the qualified student's graduation from a postsecondary institution or after any period of four consecutive years after high school graduation in which the student is not enrolled in an eligible postsecondary institution, but not before this time as long as the account holder continues using a portion of account monies for allowable expenses each year and is in good standing, the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account shall be closed and any remaining monies shall be returned to the state. L. Monies received pursuant to this article do not constitute taxable income to the parent of the qualified student. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 15-2403, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-2403. Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts; administration; appeals; risk-based audits; rules; policy handbook A. The treasurer may contract with private financial management firms to manage Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts. B. The department shall conduct or contract for annual audits of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts to ensure compliance with section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4. The department shall also conduct or contract for random, quarterly and annual audits of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts as needed to ensure compliance with section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4. The department, in consultation with the office of the auditor general, shall develop risk-based auditing procedures for audits conducted pursuant to this subsection. C. The department shall annually review a sample of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts, selected at random, to determine whether the parent or qualified student is in compliance with the terms of the contract, applicable laws, rules and orders relating to the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program. The Arizona empowerment scholarship account of a parent or qualified student who is in good standing may be randomly selected pursuant to this subsection only one time during any five-year period. The department may remove any parent or qualified student from eligibility for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account if the parent or qualified student fails to comply with the terms of the contract or applicable laws, rules or orders or knowingly misuses monies or knowingly fails to comply with the terms of the contract with intent to defraud and shall notify the treasurer. The department shall notify the treasurer to suspend the account of a parent or qualified student and shall notify the parent or qualified student in writing that the account has been suspended and that no further transactions will be allowed or disbursements made. The notification shall specify the reason for the suspension and state that the parent or qualified student has fifteen days, not including weekends, to respond and take corrective action.  If the parent or qualified student refuses or fails to contact the department, furnish any information or make any report that may be required for reinstatement within the fifteen-day period, the department may remove the parent or qualified student pursuant to this subsection. D. A parent may appeal to the state board of education any administrative decision the department makes pursuant to this article, including determinations of allowable expenses, removal from the program or enrollment eligibility. The department shall notify the parent in writing that the parent may appeal any administrative decision under this article and the process by which the parent may appeal at the same time the department notifies the parent of an administrative decision under this article. The state board of education shall establish an appeals process, and the department shall post this information on the department's website in the same location as the policy handbook developed pursuant to subsection K of this section. E. A parent may represent himself or herself or designate a representative, not necessarily an attorney, before any appeals hearing held pursuant to this section. Any designated representative who is not an attorney admitted to practice may not charge for any services rendered in connection with the hearing. The fact that a representative participated in the hearing or assisted the account holder is not grounds for reversing any administrative decision or order if the evidence supporting the decision or order is substantial, reliable and probative. F. The state board of education may refer cases of substantial misuse of monies to the attorney general for the purpose of collection or for the purpose of a criminal investigation if the state board of education obtains evidence of fraudulent use of an account. G. The department shall make quarterly transfers of the amount calculated pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection C to the treasurer for deposit in the Arizona empowerment scholarship account of each qualified student, except the department may make transfers according to another transfer schedule if the department determines a transfer schedule other than quarterly transfers is necessary to operate the Arizona empowerment scholarship account. H. The department shall accept applications between July 1 and June 30 of each year. The department shall issue an award letter to eligible applicants within thirty days after receipt of a completed application and all required documentation. If an eligible applicant completes an application in advance for an Arizona empowerment scholarship account to be funded beginning on a later date, the department may enroll the eligible applicant on the later date, except that the department may not enroll the applicant more than two fiscal quarters after the fiscal quarter in which the application is completed or on a date that is after March 31 and before July 1. If an eligible applicant completes an application after March 31 and before July 1, the department shall enroll the applicant on or after July 1. The department shall enroll all other eligible applicants when the department issues an award letter pursuant to this subsection. This subsection does not allow a qualified student to receive monies in an Arizona empowerment scholarship account while the qualified student is enrolled in a school district or charter school.  On or before September 1 and November 1 of each year, the department shall furnish to the joint legislative budget committee and the governor's office of strategic planning and budgeting an estimate of the amount required to fund Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts for the following fiscal year. The department shall include in its budget request for the following fiscal year the amount estimated pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection C for each qualified student. I. The state board of education may adopt rules and policies necessary to administer Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts, including rules and policies: 1. For establishing an appeals process pursuant to subsection D of this section. 2. For conducting or contracting for examinations of the use of account monies, consistent with subsection L of this section. 3. For conducting or contracting for random, quarterly and annual reviews of accounts. 4. For establishing or contracting for the establishment of an online anonymous fraud reporting service. 5. For establishing an anonymous telephone hotline for fraud reporting. 6. That require a surety bond or insurance for account holders. 7. For determining whether an expense is allowed, including verifying that an individual who provides tutoring or teaching services satisfies the requirements prescribed by section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (d). J. The department shall contract with an independent third party for the purposes of determining whether a qualified student is eligible to receive educational therapies or services pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (c).  If during any period on or after January 1, 2023 the department fails to ensure that a contract with an independent third party is in effect, during that period: 1. The county school superintendent of each county may approve a list of independent third parties within the county whose evaluation may be used to determine whether a qualified student who resides within the county is eligible to receive educational therapies or services pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (c). 2. If the county school superintendent of a county does not provide a list of approved independent third parties within ninety days after the beginning of any period during which the department does not have a contract with an independent third party in effect as described in this subsection, the parent of a qualified student who resides within the county has the right to obtain an independent educational evaluation from a qualified examiner to determine whether the qualified student is eligible to receive educational therapies or services pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B, paragraph 4, subdivision (c). The expense for an educational evaluation undertaken pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided by the school district within which the qualified student resides and that serves the grade level of the qualified student. For the purposes of this paragraph, "qualified examiner" means a licensed physician, psychiatrist or psychologist. K. On or before July 1 of each year, the department shall develop an applicant and participant handbook that includes information relating to policies and processes of Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts.  The policy handbook shall comply with the rules adopted by the state board of education pursuant to this section. The department shall post the handbook on the department's website. L. The department shall: 1. Establish and maintain an online database of allowable and disallowed categories of expenses and provide a link to the database on the department's website. 2. Allow the use of account monies to reimburse the parent of a qualified student or a qualified student for the purchase of a good or educational service that is an allowable expense pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection B. M. Except for cases in which the attorney general determines that a parent or account holder has committed fraud, any expenditure from an Arizona empowerment scholarship account for a purchase that the department determines is not an allowable expense pursuant to section 15-2402 and that is subsequently repaid by the parent or account holder shall be credited back to the Arizona empowerment scholarship account balance within thirty days after the receipt of payment. N. If, in response to an appeal of an administrative decision made by the department, the state board of education issues a stay of an Arizona empowerment scholarship account suspension pursuant to rules adopted by the board, the department may not withhold funding or contract renewal for the account holder because of the appealed administrative decision during the stay unless directed by the board to do so. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 15, chapter 19, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-2407, to read: START_STATUTE15-2407. Qualified schools; personnel; fingerprinting requirements; penalties; definition A. Notwithstanding sections 15-161 and 15-2404, a qualified school that ACCEPTS payment from a parent or qualified student pursuant to this chapter shall require all school personnel to both: 1. have a valid fingerprint clearance card issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1 or apply for a fingerprint clearance card within twenty days after the individual begins work. 2. Be eligible for employment at a school district or charter school in this state pursuant to section 15-505, subsection D. b. A qualified school that ACCEPTS payment from a parent or qualified student pursuant to this chapter may communicate to a school district, charter school or other qualified school for employment purposes whether any school personnel has been issued or denied a fingerprint clearance card. c. The auditor general shall annually audit qualified schools for compliance with the requirements of this section. If the auditor general finds that a qualified school has failed to comply with the requirements of this section, the auditor general shall: 1. Notify both the qualified school and the state board of education of the violation. 2. Instruct the qualified school how to cure the violation. d. If the state board of education determines that the qualified school has failed to cure the violation within sixty days after the auditor general issues a notice pursuant to subsection c of this section, the state board of education shall notify the qualified school and the department that the qualified school is not in compliance.  A qualified school that is determined to be in noncompliance pursuant to this subsection shall reimburse the department for all Arizona empowerment scholarship account monies that the qualified school received pursuant to this article during the previous school year. e. For the purposes of this section, "school personnel": 1. includes any individual who is initially hired by the qualified school after January 1, 1990 and who is any of the following: (a) A paid employee of the qualified school. (b) An individual who provides services directly to students of the qualified school and who is all of the following: (i) Not a paid employee of the qualified school. (ii) Not a parent or guardian of a student who attends the qualified school. (iii) Not under the direction of or, except for brief periods of time during a school day or school activity, within sight of a paid employee of the qualified school while providing services to students. (iv) Required or allowed to provide services directly to students. 2. does not include an individual who is either: (a) Required as a condition of licensure to be fingerprinted if the license is required for employment. (b) Reestablishing employment with a qualified school within one year after terminating employment with the same qualified school. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 23-1361, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE23-1361. Blacklist; definition; exceptions; privileged communications; immunity A. "Blacklist" means any understanding or agreement whereby the names of any person or persons, list of names, descriptions or other means of identification shall be spoken, written, printed or implied for the purpose of being communicated or transmitted between two or more employers of labor, or their bosses, foremen, superintendents, managers, officers or other agents, whereby the laborer is prevented or prohibited from engaging in a useful occupation. Any understanding or agreement between employers, or their bosses, foremen, superintendents, managers, officers or other agents, whether written or verbal, comes within the meaning of this section and it makes no difference whether the employers, or their bosses, foremen, superintendents, managers, officers or other agents, act individually or for some company, corporation, syndicate, partnership or society and it makes no difference whether they are employed or acting as agents for the same or different companies, corporations, syndicates, partnerships or societies. B. It is not unlawful for a former employer to provide to a requesting employer, or agents acting in the employer's behalf, information concerning a person's education, training, experience, qualifications and job performance to be used for the purpose of evaluating the person for employment. It is not unlawful for a school district or a qualified school as defined in section 15-2401 to provide information received as a result of a fingerprint check required by section 15-512 or 15-2407 to any other school district, charter school or qualified school as defined in section 15-2401 if requested to do so by the person who was the subject of the fingerprint check or communicate to any school district, charter school or qualified school as defined in section 15-2401 if requested to do so by the person who applied for a fingerprint clearance card whether the person has been issued or denied a fingerprint clearance card. A copy of any written communication regarding employment must be sent by the employer providing the information to the former employee's last known address. C. An employer who in good faith provides information requested by a prospective employer about the reason for termination of a former employee or about the job performance, professional conduct or evaluation of a current or former employee is immune from civil liability for the disclosure or the consequences of providing the information. There is a presumption of good faith if either: 1. The employer employs less than one hundred employees and provides only the information authorized by this subsection. 2. The employer employs at least one hundred employees and has a regular practice in this state of providing information requested by a prospective employer about the reason for termination of a former employee or about the job performance, professional conduct or evaluation of a current or former employee. D. The presumption of good faith under subsection C of this section is rebuttable by showing that the employer disclosed the information with actual malice or with intent to mislead. This subsection and subsection C of this section do not alter any privileges that exist under common law.  For the purposes of this subsection, "actual malice" means knowledge that the information was false or was provided with reckless disregard of its truth or falsity. E. Communications concerning employees or prospective employees that are made by an employer or prospective employer, or by a labor organization, to a government body or agency and that are required by law or that are furnished pursuant to written rules or policies of the government body or agency are privileged. F. An employer, including this state and its agencies, a labor organization or an individual is not civilly liable for privileged communications made pursuant to subsection E of this section. G. In response to a request by another bank, savings and loan association, credit union, escrow agent, commercial mortgage banker, mortgage banker or mortgage broker it is not unlawful for a bank, a savings and loan association, a credit union, an escrow agent, a commercial mortgage banker, a mortgage banker or a mortgage broker to provide a written employment reference that advises of the applicant's involvement in any theft, embezzlement, misappropriation or other defalcation that has been reported to federal authorities pursuant to federal banking guidelines or reported to the department of insurance and financial institutions. In order for the immunity provided in subsection H of this section to apply, a copy of the written employment reference must be sent by the institution providing the reference to the last known address of the applicant in question. H. A bank, savings and loan association, credit union, escrow agent, commercial mortgage banker, mortgage banker or mortgage broker is not civilly liable for providing an employment reference unless the information provided is false and the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, escrow agent, commercial mortgage banker, mortgage banker or mortgage broker providing the false information does so with knowledge and malice. I. A court shall award court costs, attorney fees and other related expenses to any party that prevails in any civil proceeding in which a violation of this section is alleged. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 41-619.51, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-619.51. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means the supreme court, the department of economic security, the department of child safety, the department of education, the department of health services, the department of juvenile corrections, the department of emergency and military affairs, the department of public safety, the department of transportation, the state real estate department, the department of insurance and financial institutions, the Arizona game and fish department, the Arizona department of agriculture, the board of examiners of nursing care institution administrators and assisted living facility managers, the state board of dental examiners, the Arizona state board of pharmacy, the board of physical therapy, the state board of psychologist examiners, the board of athletic training, the board of occupational therapy examiners, the state board of podiatry examiners, the acupuncture board of examiners, the state board of technical registration, the board of massage therapy, the board of behavioral health examiners or the Arizona department of housing. 2. "Board" means the board of fingerprinting. 3. "Central registry exception" means notification to the department of economic security, the department of child safety or the department of health services, as appropriate, pursuant to section 41-619.57 that the person is not disqualified because of a central registry check conducted pursuant to section 8-804. 4. "Expedited review" means an examination, in accordance with board rule, of the documents an applicant submits by the board or its hearing officer without the applicant being present. 5. "Good cause exception" means the issuance of a fingerprint clearance card to an employee pursuant to section 41-619.55. 6. "Person" means a person who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to this article or who is subject to a central registry check and any of the following: (a) Section 3-314. (b) Section 8-105. (c) Section 8-322. (d) Section 8-463. (e) Section 8-509. (f) Section 8-802. (g) Section 8-804. (h) Section 15-183. (i) Section 15-503. (j) Section 15-512. (k) Section 15-534. (l) Section 15-763.01. (m) Section 15-782.02. (n) Section 15-1330. (o) Section 15-1881. (p) Section 15-2407. (p) (q) Section 17-215. (q) (r) Section 28-3228. (r) (s) Section 28-3413. (s) (t) Section 32-122.02. (t) (u) Section 32-122.05. (u) (v) Section 32-122.06. (v) (w) Section 32-823. (w) (x) Section 32-1232. (x) (y) Section 32-1276.01. (y) (z) Section 32-1284. (z) (aa) Section 32-1297.01. (aa) (bb) Section 32-1904. (bb) (cc) Section 32-1941. (cc) (dd) Section 32-1982. (dd) (ee) Section 32-2022. (ee) (ff) Section 32-2063. (ff) (gg) Section 32-2108.01. (gg) (hh) Section 32-2123. (hh) (ii) Section 32-2371. (ii) (jj) Section 32-3271. (jj) (kk) Section 32-3430. (kk) (ll) Section 32-3620. (ll) (mm) Section 32-3668. (mm) (nn) Section 32-3669. (nn) (oo) Section 32-3922. (oo) (pp) Section 32-3924. (pp) (qq) Section 32-4128. (qq) (rr) Section 32-4222. (rr) (ss) Section 36-113. (ss) (tt) Section 36-207. (tt) (uu) Section 36-411. (uu) (vv) Section 36-425.03. (vv) (ww) Section 36-446.04. (ww) (xx) Section 36-594.01. (xx) (yy) Section 36-594.02. (yy) (zz) Section 36-766.01. (zz) (aaa) Section 36-882. (aaa) (bbb) Section 36-883.02. (bbb) (ccc) Section 36-897.01. (ccc) (ddd) Section 36-897.03. (ddd) (eee) Section 36-1940. (eee) (fff) Section 36-1940.01. (fff) (ggg) Section 36-2069. (ggg) (hhh) Section 36-3008. (hhh) (iii) Section 41-619.53. (iii) (jjj) Section 41-1964. (jjj) (kkk) Section 41-1967.01. (kkk) (lll) Section 41-1968. (lll) (mmm) Section 41-1969. (mmm) (nnn) Section 41-2814. (nnn) (ooo) Section 41-4025. (ooo) (ppp) Section 46-141, subsection A or B. (ppp) (qqq) Section 46-321.END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 41-1750, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1750. Central state repository; department of public safety; duties; funds; accounts; definitions A. The department is responsible for the effective operation of the central state repository in order to collect, store and disseminate complete and accurate Arizona criminal history records and related criminal justice information. The department may procure criminal history records and related criminal justice information for violations that are not listed in this section.  The department shall: 1. Procure from all criminal justice agencies in this state accurate and complete personal identification data, fingerprints, charges, process control numbers and dispositions and such other information as may be pertinent to all persons who have been charged with, arrested for, convicted of or summoned to court as a criminal defendant for any of the following: (a) A felony offense or an offense involving domestic violence as defined in section 13-3601. (b) A violation of title 13, chapter 14 or title 28, chapter 4. (c) An offense listed in: (i) Section 32-2422, subsection A, paragraph 4. (ii) Section 32-2441, paragraph 4. (iii) Section 32-2612, subsection A, paragraph 4. (iv) Section 32-2622, subsection A, paragraph 4. (v) Section 41-1758.03, subsections B and C. (vi) Section 41-1758.07, subsections B and C. 2. Collect information concerning the number and nature of offenses known to have been committed in this state and of the legal steps taken in connection with these offenses, such other information that is useful in the study of crime and in the administration of criminal justice and all other information deemed necessary to operate the statewide uniform crime reporting program and to cooperate with the federal government uniform crime reporting program. 3. Collect information concerning criminal offenses that manifest evidence of prejudice based on race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender, antisemitism or disability. 4. Cooperate with the central state repositories in other states and with the appropriate agency of the federal government in the exchange of information pertinent to violators of the law. 5. Ensure the rapid exchange of information concerning the commission of crime and the detection of violators of the law among the criminal justice agencies of other states and of the federal government. 6. Furnish assistance to peace officers throughout this state in crime scene investigation for the detection of latent fingerprints and in the comparison of latent fingerprints. 7. Conduct periodic operational audits of the central state repository and of a representative sample of other agencies that contribute records to or receive criminal justice information from the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system. 8. Establish and enforce the necessary physical and system safeguards to ensure that the criminal justice information maintained and disseminated by the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system is appropriately protected from unauthorized inquiry, modification, destruction or dissemination as required by this section. 9. Aid and encourage coordination and cooperation among criminal justice agencies through the statewide and interstate exchange of criminal justice information. 10. Provide training and proficiency testing on the use of criminal justice information to agencies receiving information from the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system. 11. Operate and maintain the Arizona automated fingerprint identification system established by section 41-2411. 12. Provide criminal history record information to the fingerprinting division for the purpose of screening applicants for fingerprint clearance cards. B. The director may establish guidelines for the submission and retention of criminal justice information as deemed useful for the study or prevention of crime and for the administration of criminal justice. C. Criminal justice agencies may provide criminal history records and related criminal justice information for violations that are not listed in this section. Except for the requirements listed in subsection U of this section, the chief officers of criminal justice agencies of this state or its political subdivisions shall provide to the central state repository fingerprints and information concerning personal identification data, descriptions, crimes for which persons are arrested, process control numbers and dispositions and such other information, including other biometric data, as may be pertinent to all persons who have been charged with, arrested for, convicted of or summoned to court as criminal defendants for any of the following: 1. Felony offenses or offenses involving domestic violence as defined in section 13-3601. 2. Violations of title 13, chapter 14 or title 28, chapter 4 that have occurred in this state. 3. An offense listed in: (a) Section 32-2422, subsection A, paragraph 4. (b) Section 32-2441, paragraph 4. (c) Section 32-2612, subsection A, paragraph 4. (d) Section 32-2622, subsection A, paragraph 4. (e) Section 41-1758.03, subsections B and C. (f) Section 41-1758.07, subsections B and C. D. The chief officers of law enforcement agencies of this state or its political subdivisions shall provide to the department such information as necessary to operate the statewide uniform crime reporting program and to cooperate with the federal government uniform crime reporting program. E. The chief officers of criminal justice agencies of this state or its political subdivisions shall comply with the training and proficiency testing guidelines as required by the department to comply with the federal national crime information center mandates. F. The chief officers of criminal justice agencies of this state or its political subdivisions also shall provide to the department information concerning crimes that manifest evidence of prejudice based on race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender, antisemitism or disability. G. The director shall authorize the exchange of criminal justice information between the central state repository, or through the Arizona criminal justice information system, whether directly or through any intermediary, only as follows: 1. With criminal justice agencies of the federal government, Indian tribes, this state or its political subdivisions and other states, on request by the chief officers of such agencies or their designated representatives, specifically for the purposes of the administration of criminal justice and for evaluating the fitness of current and prospective criminal justice employees. Fingerprints submitted pursuant to this paragraph may be searched through the department and the federal bureau of investigation to conduct criminal history records checks. The department may conduct criminal history records checks through state and federal rap back services for the purpose of updating the status of current criminal justice employees or volunteers and may notify the criminal justice agency of the results of the records check. The department is authorized to submit fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation to be retained for the purpose of being searched by future submissions to the federal bureau of investigation, including latent fingerprint searches. The department may retain fingerprints submitted pursuant to this paragraph for the purpose of being searched by future submissions to the department, including latent fingerprint searches. 2. With any noncriminal justice agency pursuant to a statute, ordinance or executive order that specifically authorizes the noncriminal justice agency to receive criminal history record information for the purpose of evaluating the fitness of current or prospective licensees, employees, contract employees or volunteers, on submission of the subject's fingerprints and the prescribed fee. Each statute, ordinance, or executive order that authorizes noncriminal justice agencies to receive criminal history record information for these purposes shall identify the specific categories of licensees, employees, contract employees or volunteers and shall require that fingerprints of the specified individuals be submitted in conjunction with such requests for criminal history record information. Fingerprints submitted pursuant to this paragraph may be searched through the department and the federal bureau of investigation to conduct criminal history records checks. The department may conduct criminal history records checks through state and federal rap back services for the purpose of updating the status of current licensees, employees, contract employees or volunteers and may notify the noncriminal justice agency of the results of the records check. The department is authorized to submit fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation to be retained for the purpose of being searched by future submissions to the federal bureau of investigation, including latent fingerprint searches. The department is authorized to retain fingerprints submitted pursuant to this paragraph for the purpose of being searched by future submissions to the department, including latent fingerprint searches. 3. With the board of fingerprinting for the purpose of conducting good cause exceptions pursuant to section 41-619.55 and central registry exceptions pursuant to section 41-619.57. 4. With any individual for any lawful purpose on submission of the subject of record's fingerprints and the prescribed fee. 5. With the governor, if the governor elects to become actively involved in the investigation of criminal activity or the administration of criminal justice in accordance with the governor's constitutional duty to ensure that the laws are faithfully executed or as needed to carry out the other responsibilities of the governor's office. 6. With regional computer centers that maintain authorized computer-to-computer interfaces with the department, that are criminal justice agencies or under the management control of a criminal justice agency and that are established by a statute, ordinance or executive order to provide automated data processing services to criminal justice agencies specifically for the purposes of the administration of criminal justice or evaluating the fitness of regional computer center employees who have access to the Arizona criminal justice information system and the national crime information center system. 7. With an individual who asserts a belief that criminal history record information relating to the individual is maintained by an agency or in an information system in this state that is subject to this section.  On submission of fingerprints, the individual may review this information for the purpose of determining its accuracy and completeness by making application to the agency operating the system.  Rules adopted under this section shall include provisions for administrative review and necessary correction of any inaccurate or incomplete information. The review and challenge process authorized by this paragraph is limited to criminal history record information. 8. With individuals and agencies pursuant to a specific agreement with a criminal justice agency to provide services required for the administration of criminal justice pursuant to that agreement if the agreement specifically authorizes access to data, limits the use of data to purposes for which given and ensures the security and confidentiality of the data consistent with this section. 9. With individuals and agencies for the express purpose of research, evaluative or statistical activities pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency if the agreement specifically authorizes access to data, limits the use of data to research, evaluative or statistical purposes and ensures the confidentiality and security of the data consistent with this section. 10. With the auditor general for audit purposes. 11. With central state repositories of other states for noncriminal justice purposes for dissemination in accordance with the laws of those states. 12. On submission of the fingerprint card, with the department of child safety and a tribal social services agency to provide criminal history record information on prospective adoptive parents for the purpose of conducting the preadoption certification investigation under title 8, chapter 1, article 1 if the department of economic security is conducting the investigation, or with an agency or a person appointed by the court, if the agency or person is conducting the investigation. Information received under this paragraph shall only be used for the purposes of the preadoption certification investigation. 13. With the department of child safety, a tribal social services agency and the superior court for the purpose of evaluating the fitness of custodians or prospective custodians of juveniles, including parents, relatives and prospective guardians. Information received under this paragraph shall only be used for the purposes of that evaluation. The information shall be provided on submission of either: (a) The fingerprint card. (b) The name, date of birth and social security number of the person. 14. On submission of a fingerprint card, provide criminal history record information to the superior court for the purpose of evaluating the fitness of investigators appointed under section 14-5303 or 14-5407, guardians appointed under section 14-5206 or 14-5304 or conservators appointed under section 14-5401. 15. With the supreme court to provide criminal history record information on prospective fiduciaries pursuant to section 14-5651. 16. With the department of juvenile corrections to provide criminal history record information pursuant to section 41-2814. 17. On submission of the fingerprint card, provide criminal history record information to the Arizona peace officer standards and training board or a board certified law enforcement academy to evaluate the fitness of prospective cadets. 18. With the internet sex offender website database established pursuant to section 13-3827. 19. With licensees of the United States nuclear regulatory commission for the purpose of determining whether an individual should be granted unescorted access to the protected area of a commercial nuclear generating station on submission of the subject of record's fingerprints and the prescribed fee. 20. With the state board of education for the purpose of evaluating the fitness of a certificated educator, an applicant for a teaching or administrative certificate or a noncertificated person as defined in section 15-505 if the state board of education or its employees or agents have reasonable suspicion that the educator or person engaged in conduct that would be a criminal violation of the laws of this state or was involved in immoral or unprofessional conduct or that the applicant engaged in conduct that would warrant disciplinary action if the applicant were certificated at the time of the alleged conduct. The information shall be provided on the submission of either: (a) The fingerprint card. (b) The name, date of birth and social security number of the person. 21. With each school district and charter school in this state and with each qualified school that accepts payment from the parent of one or more qualified students pursuant to title 15, chapter 19.  The department of education and the state board for charter schools shall provide the department of public safety with a current list of email addresses for each school district, and charter school and qualified school in this state and shall periodically provide the department of public safety with updated email addresses. If the department of public safety is notified that a person who is required to have a fingerprint clearance card to be employed by or to engage in volunteer activities at a school district, or charter school or qualified school has been arrested for or convicted of an offense listed in section 41-1758.03, subsection B or has been arrested for or convicted of an offense that amounts to unprofessional conduct under section 15-550, the department of public safety shall notify each school district, and charter school and qualified school in this state that the person's fingerprint clearance card has been suspended or revoked. 22. With a tribal social services agency and the department of child safety as provided by law, which currently is the Adam Walsh child protection and safety act of 2006 (42 United States Code section 16961), for the purposes of investigating or responding to reports of child abuse, neglect or exploitation.  Information received pursuant to this paragraph from the national crime information center, the interstate identification index and the Arizona criminal justice information system network shall only be used for the purposes of investigating or responding as prescribed in this paragraph. The information shall be provided on submission to the department of public safety of either: (a) The fingerprints of the person being investigated. (b) The name, date of birth and social security number of the person. 23. With a nonprofit organization that interacts with children or vulnerable adults for the lawful purpose of evaluating the fitness of all current and prospective employees, contractors and volunteers of the organization. The criminal history record information shall be provided on submission of the applicant's fingerprint card and the prescribed fee.  Fingerprints submitted pursuant to this paragraph may be searched by the department to conduct state criminal history records checks. 24. With the superior court for the purpose of determining an individual's eligibility for substance abuse and treatment courts in a family or juvenile case. 25. With the governor to provide criminal history record information on prospective gubernatorial nominees, appointees and employees as provided by law. H. The director shall adopt rules necessary to execute this section. I. The director, in the manner prescribed by law, shall remove and destroy records that the director determines are no longer of value in the detection or prevention of crime. J. The director shall establish a fee in an amount necessary to cover the cost of federal noncriminal justice fingerprint processing for criminal history record information checks that are authorized by law for noncriminal justice employment, licensing or other lawful purposes. An additional fee may be charged by the department for state noncriminal justice fingerprint processing. Fees submitted to the department for state noncriminal justice fingerprint processing are not refundable. K. The director shall establish a fee in an amount necessary to cover the cost of processing copies of department reports, eight by ten inch black and white photographs or eight by ten inch color photographs of traffic accident scenes. L. Except as provided in subsection O of this section, each agency authorized by this section may charge a fee, in addition to any other fees prescribed by law, in an amount necessary to cover the cost of state and federal noncriminal justice fingerprint processing for criminal history record information checks that are authorized by law for noncriminal justice employment, licensing or other lawful purposes. M. A fingerprint account within the records processing fund is established for the purpose of separately accounting for the collection and payment of fees for noncriminal justice fingerprint processing by the department. Monies collected for this purpose shall be credited to the account, and payments by the department to the United States for federal noncriminal justice fingerprint processing shall be charged against the account. Monies in the account not required for payment to the United States shall be used by the department in support of the department's noncriminal justice fingerprint processing duties. At the end of each fiscal year, any balance in the account not required for payment to the United States or to support the department's noncriminal justice fingerprint processing duties reverts to the state general fund. N. A records processing fund is established for the purpose of separately accounting for the collection and payment of fees for department reports and photographs of traffic accident scenes processed by the department. Monies collected for this purpose shall be credited to the fund and shall be used by the department in support of functions related to providing copies of department reports and photographs.  At the end of each fiscal year, any balance in the fund not required for support of the functions related to providing copies of department reports and photographs reverts to the state general fund. O. The department of child safety may pay from appropriated monies the cost of federal fingerprint processing or federal criminal history record information checks that are authorized by law for employees and volunteers of the department, guardians pursuant to section 8-453, subsection A, paragraph 6, the licensing of foster parents or the certification of adoptive parents. P. The director shall adopt rules that provide for: 1. The collection and disposition of fees pursuant to this section. 2. The refusal of service to those agencies that are delinquent in paying these fees. Q. The director shall ensure that the following limitations are observed regarding dissemination of criminal justice information obtained from the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system: 1. Any criminal justice agency that obtains criminal justice information from the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system assumes responsibility for the security of the information and shall not secondarily disseminate this information to any individual or agency not authorized to receive this information directly from the central state repository or originating agency. 2. Dissemination to an authorized agency or individual may be accomplished by a criminal justice agency only if the dissemination is for criminal justice purposes in connection with the prescribed duties of the agency and not in violation of this section. 3. Criminal history record information disseminated to noncriminal justice agencies or to individuals shall be used only for the purposes for which it was given. Secondary dissemination is prohibited unless otherwise authorized by law. 4. The existence or nonexistence of criminal history record information shall not be confirmed to any individual or agency not authorized to receive the information itself. 5. Criminal history record information to be released for noncriminal justice purposes to agencies of other states shall only be released to the central state repositories of those states for dissemination in accordance with the laws of those states. 6. Criminal history record information shall be released to noncriminal justice agencies of the federal government pursuant to the terms of the federal security clearance information act (P.L. 99-169). R. This section and the rules adopted under this section apply to all agencies and individuals collecting, storing or disseminating criminal justice information processed by manual or automated operations if the collection, storage or dissemination is funded in whole or in part with monies made available by the law enforcement assistance administration after July 1, 1973, pursuant to title I of the crime control act of 1973, and to all agencies that interact with or receive criminal justice information from or through the central state repository and through the Arizona criminal justice information system. S. This section does not apply to criminal history record information contained in: 1. Posters, arrest warrants, announcements or lists for identifying or apprehending fugitives or wanted persons. 2. Original records of entry such as police blotters maintained by criminal justice agencies, compiled chronologically and required by law or long-standing custom to be made public if these records are organized on a chronological basis. 3. Transcripts or records of judicial proceedings if released by a court or legislative or administrative proceedings. 4. Announcements of executive clemency or pardon. 5. Computer databases, other than the Arizona criminal justice information system, that are specifically designed for community notification of an offender's presence in the community pursuant to section 13-3825 or for public informational purposes authorized by section 13-3827. T. This section does not prevent a criminal justice agency from disclosing to the public criminal history record information that is reasonably contemporaneous to the event for which an individual is currently within the criminal justice system, including information noted on traffic accident reports concerning citations, blood alcohol tests or arrests made in connection with the traffic accident being investigated. U. In order to ensure that complete and accurate criminal history record information is maintained and disseminated by the central state repository: 1. The booking agency shall take legible ten-print fingerprints of all persons who are arrested for offenses listed in subsection C of this section. The booking agency shall obtain a process control number and provide to the person fingerprinted a document that indicates proof of the fingerprinting and that informs the person that the document must be presented to the court. 2. Except as provided in paragraph 3 of this subsection, if a person is summoned to court as a result of an indictment or complaint for an offense listed in subsection C of this section, the court shall order the person to appear before the county sheriff and provide legible ten-print fingerprints. The county sheriff shall obtain a process control number and provide a document to the person fingerprinted that indicates proof of the fingerprinting and that informs the person that the document must be presented to the court. For the purposes of this paragraph, "summoned" includes a written promise to appear by the defendant on a uniform traffic ticket and complaint. 3. If a person is arrested for a misdemeanor offense listed in subsection C of this section by a city or town law enforcement agency, the person shall appear before the law enforcement agency that arrested the defendant and provide legible ten-print fingerprints.  The law enforcement agency shall obtain a process control number and provide a document to the person fingerprinted that indicates proof of the fingerprinting and that informs the person that the document must be presented to the court. 4. The mandatory fingerprint compliance form shall contain the following information: (a) Whether ten-print fingerprints have been obtained from the person. (b) Whether a process control number was obtained. (c) The offense or offenses for which the process control number was obtained. (d) Any report number of the arresting authority. (e) Instructions on reporting for ten-print fingerprinting, including available times and locations for reporting for ten-print fingerprinting. (f) Instructions that direct the person to provide the form to the court at the person's next court appearance. 5. Within ten days after a person is fingerprinted, the arresting authority or agency that took the fingerprints shall forward the fingerprints to the department in the manner or form required by the department. 6. On the issuance of a summons for a defendant who is charged with an offense listed in subsection C of this section, the summons shall direct the defendant to provide ten-print fingerprints to the appropriate law enforcement agency. 7. At the initial appearance or on the arraignment of a summoned defendant who is charged with an offense listed in subsection C of this section, if the person does not present a completed mandatory fingerprint compliance form to the court or if the court has not received the process control number, the court shall order that within twenty calendar days the defendant be ten-print fingerprinted at a designated time and place by the appropriate law enforcement agency. 8. If the defendant fails to present a completed mandatory fingerprint compliance form or if the court has not received the process control number, the court, on its own motion, may remand the defendant into custody for ten-print fingerprinting. If otherwise eligible for release, the defendant shall be released from custody after being ten-print fingerprinted. 9. In every criminal case in which the defendant is incarcerated or fingerprinted as a result of the charge, an originating law enforcement agency or prosecutor, within forty days of the disposition, shall advise the central state repository of all dispositions concerning the termination of criminal proceedings against an individual arrested for an offense specified in subsection C of this section. This information shall be submitted on a form or in a manner required by the department. 10. Dispositions resulting from formal proceedings in a court having jurisdiction in a criminal action against an individual who is arrested for an offense specified in subsection C of this section or section 8-341, subsection Q, paragraph 3 shall be reported to the central state repository within forty days of the date of the disposition.  This information shall be submitted on a form or in a manner specified by rules approved by the supreme court. 11. The state department of corrections or the department of juvenile corrections, within forty days, shall advise the central state repository that it has assumed supervision of a person convicted of an offense specified in subsection C of this section or section 8-341, subsection Q, paragraph 3. The state department of corrections or the department of juvenile corrections shall also report dispositions that occur thereafter to the central state repository within forty days of the date of the dispositions. This information shall be submitted on a form or in a manner required by the department of public safety. 12. Each criminal justice agency shall query the central state repository before dissemination of any criminal history record information to ensure the completeness of the information. Inquiries shall be made before any dissemination except in those cases in which time is of the essence and the repository is technically incapable of responding within the necessary time period. If time is of the essence, the inquiry shall still be made and the response shall be provided as soon as possible. V. The director shall adopt rules specifying that any agency that collects, stores or disseminates criminal justice information that is subject to this section shall establish effective security measures to protect the information from unauthorized access, disclosure, modification or dissemination. The rules shall include reasonable safeguards to protect the affected information systems from fire, flood, wind, theft, sabotage or other natural or man-made hazards or disasters. W. The department shall make available to agencies that contribute to, or receive criminal justice information from, the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system a continuing training program in the proper methods for collecting, storing and disseminating information in compliance with this section. X. This section does not create a cause of action or a right to bring an action, including an action based on discrimination due to sexual orientation. Y. The definition prescribed in subsection Z, paragraph 3 of this section does not diminish or infringe on any rights protected under the first amendment to the United States constitution or the Arizona constitution. Z. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Administration of criminal justice" means performance of the detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release, posttrial release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision or rehabilitation of criminal offenders. Administration of criminal justice includes enforcement of criminal traffic offenses and civil traffic violations, including parking violations, when performed by a criminal justice agency.  Administration of criminal justice also includes criminal identification activities and the collection, storage and dissemination of criminal history record information. 2. "Administrative records" means records that contain adequate and proper documentation of the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures and essential transactions of the agency and that are designed to furnish information to protect the rights of this state and of persons directly affected by the agency's activities. 3. "Antisemitism" includes the definition of antisemitism that was adopted by the international holocaust remembrance alliance on May 26, 2016 and that has been adopted by the United States department of state, including the contemporary examples of antisemitism identified in the adopted definition. 4. "Arizona criminal justice information system" or "system" means the statewide information system managed by the director for the collection, processing, preservation, dissemination and exchange of criminal justice information and includes the electronic equipment, facilities, procedures and agreements necessary to exchange this information. 5. "Biometric data" means any physical characteristics, including fingerprints and palm prints and face, tattoo and iris images. 6. "Booking agency" means the county sheriff or, if a person is booked into a municipal jail, the municipal law enforcement agency. 7. "Central state repository" means the central location within the department for the collection, storage and dissemination of Arizona criminal history records and related criminal justice information. 8. "Criminal history record information" and "criminal history record" means information that is collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals and that consists of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments and other formal criminal charges, and any disposition arising from those actions, sentencing, formal correctional supervisory action and release. Criminal history record information and criminal history record do not include identification information to the extent that the information does not indicate involvement of the individual in the criminal justice system or information relating to juveniles unless they have been adjudicated as adults. 9. "Criminal justice agency" means either: (a) A court at any governmental level with criminal or equivalent jurisdiction, including courts of any foreign sovereignty duly recognized by the federal government. (b) A government agency or subunit of a government agency that is specifically authorized to perform as its principal function the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute, ordinance or executive order and that allocates more than fifty percent of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice. This subdivision includes agencies of any foreign sovereignty duly recognized by the federal government. 10. "Criminal justice information" means information that is collected by criminal justice agencies and that is needed for the performance of their legally authorized and required functions, such as criminal history record information, citation information, stolen property information, traffic accident reports, wanted persons information and system network log searches. Criminal justice information does not include the administrative records of a criminal justice agency. 11. "Disposition" means information disclosing that a decision has been made not to bring criminal charges or that criminal proceedings have been concluded or information relating to sentencing, correctional supervision, release from correctional supervision, the outcome of an appellate review of criminal proceedings or executive clemency. 12. "Dissemination" means the written, oral or electronic communication or transfer of criminal justice information to individuals and agencies other than the criminal justice agency that maintains the information. Dissemination includes the act of confirming the existence or nonexistence of criminal justice information. 13. "Management control": (a) Means the authority to set and enforce: (i) Priorities regarding development and operation of criminal justice information systems and programs. (ii) Standards for the selection, supervision and termination of personnel involved in the development of criminal justice information systems and programs and in the collection, maintenance, analysis and dissemination of criminal justice information. (iii) Policies governing the operation of computers, circuits and telecommunications terminals used to process criminal justice information to the extent that the equipment is used to process, store or transmit criminal justice information. (b) Includes the supervision of equipment, systems design, programming and operating procedures necessary for the development and implementation of automated criminal justice information systems. 14. "Process control number" means the Arizona automated fingerprint identification system number that attaches to each arrest event at the time of fingerprinting and that is assigned to the arrest fingerprint card, disposition form and other pertinent documents. 15. "qualified school" has the same meaning prescribed in section 15-2401. 15. 16. "Rap back services" means real-time or near real-time notifications of activity, such as arrests on an individual, for authorized criminal justice or noncriminal justice purposes in which continuous evaluation of the individual's criminal history is required. 16. 17. "Secondary dissemination" means the dissemination of criminal justice information from an individual or agency that originally obtained the information from the central state repository or through the Arizona criminal justice information system to another individual or agency. 17. 18. "Sexual orientation" means consensual homosexuality or heterosexuality. 18. 19. "Subject of record" means the person who is the primary subject of a criminal justice record. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 41-1758, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Agency" means the supreme court, the department of economic security, the department of child safety, the department of education, the department of health services, the department of juvenile corrections, the department of emergency and military affairs, the department of public safety, the department of transportation, the state real estate department, the department of insurance and financial institutions, the board of fingerprinting, the Arizona game and fish department, the Arizona department of agriculture, the board of examiners of nursing care institution administrators and assisted living facility managers, the state board of dental examiners, the Arizona state board of pharmacy, the board of physical therapy, the state board of psychologist examiners, the board of athletic training, the board of occupational therapy examiners, the state board of podiatry examiners, the acupuncture board of examiners, the state board of technical registration, the board of massage therapy, the board of behavioral health examiners or the Arizona department of housing. 2. "Division" means the fingerprinting division in the department of public safety. 3. "Electronic or internet-based fingerprinting services" means a secure system for digitizing applicant fingerprints and transmitting the applicant data and fingerprints of a person or entity submitting fingerprints to the department of public safety for any authorized purpose under this title. For the purposes of this paragraph, "secure system" means a system that complies with the information technology security policy approved by the department of public safety. 4. "Good cause exception" means the issuance of a fingerprint clearance card to an applicant pursuant to section 41-619.55. 5. "Person" means a person who is required to be fingerprinted pursuant to any of the following: (a) Section 3-314. (b) Section 8-105. (c) Section 8-322. (d) Section 8-463. (e) Section 8-509. (f) Section 8-802. (g) Section 15-183. (h) Section 15-503. (i) Section 15-512. (j) Section 15-534. (k) Section 15-763.01. (l) Section 15-782.02. (m) Section 15-1330. (n) Section 15-1881. (o) Section 15-2407. (o) (p) Section 17-215. (p) (q) Section 28-3228. (q) (r) Section 28-3413. (r) (s) Section 32-122.02. (s) (t) Section 32-122.05. (t) (u) Section 32-122.06. (u) (v) Section 32-823. (v) (w) Section 32-1232. (w) (x) Section 32-1276.01. (x) (y) Section 32-1284. (y) (z) Section 32-1297.01. (z) (aa) Section 32-1904. (aa) (bb) Section 32-1941. (bb) (cc) Section 32-1982. (cc) (dd) Section 32-2022. (dd) (ee) Section 32-2063. (ee) (ff) Section 32-2108.01. (ff) (gg) Section 32-2123. (gg) (hh) Section 32-2371. (hh) (ii) Section 32-3271. (ii) (jj) Section 32-3430. (jj) (kk) Section 32-3620. (kk) (ll) Section 32-3668. (ll) (mm) Section 32-3669. (mm) (nn) Section 32-3922. (nn) (oo) Section 32-3924. (oo) (pp) Section 32-4128. (pp) (qq) Section 32-4222. (qq) (rr) Section 36-113. (rr) (ss) Section 36-207. (ss) (tt) Section 36-411. (tt) (uu) Section 36-425.03. (uu) (vv) Section 36-446.04. (vv) (ww) Section 36-594.01. (ww) (xx) Section 36-594.02. (xx) (yy) Section 36-766.01. (yy) (zz) Section 36-882. (zz) (aaa) Section 36-883.02. (aaa) (bbb) Section 36-897.01. (bbb) (ccc) Section 36-897.03. (ccc) (ddd) Section 36-1940. (ddd) (eee) Section 36-1940.01. (eee) (fff) Section 36-2069. (fff) (ggg) Section 36-3008. (ggg) (hhh) Section 41-619.52. (hhh) (iii) Section 41-619.53. (iii) (jjj) Section 41-1964. (jjj) (kkk) Section 41-1967.01. (kkk) (lll) Section 41-1968. (lll) (mmm) Section 41-1969. (mmm) (nnn) Section 41-2814. (nnn) (ooo) Section 41-4025. (ooo) (ppp) Section 46-141, subsection A or B. (ppp) (qqq) Section 46-321. 6. "Rap back services" has the same meaning prescribed in section 41-1750. 7. "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3623. END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 41-1758.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758.01. Fingerprinting division; powers and duties A. The fingerprinting division is established in the department of public safety and shall: 1. Conduct fingerprint background checks for persons and applicants who are seeking licenses from state agencies, employment with licensees, contract providers and state agencies or employment or educational opportunities with agencies that require fingerprint background checks pursuant to sections 3-314, 8-105, 8-322, 8-463, 8-509, 8-802, 15-183, 15-503, 15-512, 15-534, 15-763.01, 15-782.02, 15-1330, 15-1881, 15-2407, 17-215, 28-3228, 28-3413, 32-122.02, 32-122.05, 32-122.06, 32-823, 32-1232, 32-1276.01, 32-1284, 32-1297.01, 32-1904, 32-1941, 32-1982, 32-2022, 32-2063, 32-2108.01, 32-2123, 32-2371, 32-3271, 32-3430, 32-3620, 32-3668, 32-3669, 32-3922, 32-3924, 32-4128, 32-4222, 36-113, 36-207, 36-411, 36-425.03, 36-446.04, 36-594.01, 36-594.02, 36-766.01, 36-882, 36-883.02, 36-897.01, 36-897.03, 36-1940, 36-1940.01, 36-2069, 36-3008, 41-619.52, 41-619.53, 41-1964, 41-1967.01, 41-1968, 41-1969, 41-2814 and 41-4025, section 46-141, subsection A or B and section 46-321. 2. Issue fingerprint clearance cards. On issuance, a fingerprint clearance card becomes the personal property of the cardholder and the cardholder shall retain possession of the fingerprint clearance card. 3. On submission of an application for a fingerprint clearance card, collect the fees established by the board of fingerprinting pursuant to section 41-619.53 and deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, the monies collected in the board of fingerprinting fund. 4. Inform in writing each person who submits fingerprints for a fingerprint background check of the right to petition the board of fingerprinting for a good cause exception pursuant to section 41-1758.03, 41-1758.04 or 41-1758.07. 5. If after conducting a state and federal criminal history records check the division determines that it is not authorized to issue a fingerprint clearance card to a person, inform the person in writing that the division is not authorized to issue a fingerprint clearance card. The notice shall include the criminal history information on which the denial was based. This criminal history information is subject to dissemination restrictions pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. 6. Notify the person in writing if the division suspends, revokes or places a driving restriction notation on a fingerprint clearance card pursuant to section 41-1758.04. The notice shall include the criminal history information on which the suspension, revocation or placement of the driving restriction notation was based. This criminal history information is subject to dissemination restrictions pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544. 7. Administer and enforce this article. B. The fingerprinting division may contract for electronic or internet-based fingerprinting services through an entity or entities for the acquisition and transmission of applicant fingerprint and data submissions to the department, including identity verified fingerprints pursuant to section 15-106. The entity or entities contracted by the department of public safety may charge the applicant a fee for services provided pursuant to this article. The entity or entities contracted by the department of public safety shall comply with: 1. All information privacy and security measures and submission standards established by the department of public safety. 2. The information technology security policy approved by the department of public safety.END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 41-1758.08, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1758.08. Fingerprint clearance card; use of expired card A. Notwithstanding any other law, an expired fingerprint clearance card may be used to satisfy the fingerprint requirements of section 15-183, 15-503, 15-512, 15-534, 15-782.02, 15-1330, or 15-1881 or 15-2407 if the person signs an affidavit stating both of the following: 1. The person submitted a completed application to the division for a new fingerprint clearance card within ninety days before the expiration date on the person's current fingerprint clearance card. 2. The person is not awaiting trial on and has not been convicted of a criminal offense that would make the person ineligible for a fingerprint clearance card. B. This section does not apply to a fingerprint clearance card that has been denied, suspended or revoked or to a person who has requested a good cause exception hearing. END_STATUTE Sec. 11. Fingerprinting requirement; current school personnel Notwithstanding section 15-2407, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, current school personnel, as defined in section 15-2407, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, must comply with the fingerprint clearance card requirements prescribed in section 15-2407, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, within six months after the effective date of this act.